Utah statutes.
31A-27a-509.   Claims of holders of void or voidable rights.
(1) (a)  The receiver may disallow a claim of a creditor who receives or
acquires a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance
voidable under this chapter, unless the creditor surrenders the preference,
lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance.
(b)  If an avoidance is effected by a proceeding in which a final judgment is
entered, a creditor's claim is not allowed unless the money is paid or the
property is delivered to the receiver within 30 days from the day on which the
final judgment is entered, except that the receivership court may allow
further time if there is an appeal or other continuation of the proceeding.
(2)  A claim allowable under Subsection (1) by reason of an avoidance, whether
voluntary or involuntary, or a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer,
assignment, or encumbrance, may be filed as an excused late filing under
Subsection 31A-27a-601(2) if filed within:
(a)  30 days from the date of the avoidance; or
(b)  the further time allowed by the receivership court under Subsection (1).
